Washington statutes.
RCW 41.47.010

Benefits of federal act accepted.

The state of Washington in behalf of all its eligible officials and employees and the eligible officials and employees of all its counties, cities and towns, and of any and all other of its municipal corporations and political subdivisions which levy taxes and employ and pay salaries and wages to officials and employees including public utility districts, hereby accepts the benefits of the old age and survivors' insurance benefit provisions of the federal social security act, whenever the provisions of such act are extended to embrace such officials and employees.

[ 1941 c 205 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9998-57. Formerly RCW 74.40.010.]